Hawaii statutes.
§149A-37 Exemptions. (a) Exemption
from this chapter may be granted by the department to the University of Hawaii
and other state and federal agencies for experimental or research work directed
toward obtaining knowledge of the characteristics and proper usage of
unspecified or experimental pesticides. Research and experimental work
conducted by private agencies with adequate research facilities may also be
similarly exempted upon approval by the department. Approval shall be in
writing stating the specific exemptions and conditions.

(b) Any pesticide exempted by the
Administrator of the EPA pursuant to Title 7, United States Code, section
136w(b), shall be exempt from this chapter, if the pesticide product meets the
terms and conditions of the EPA's exemption, except for pesticides that the
department has determined by rule may cause unreasonable adverse effects on the
environment. [L 1972, c 58, pt of §1; am L 1975, c 126, pt of §1; am L 2000, c
154, §5]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next